Hawaii statutes.
§27-4 Offenses and penalties not affected;
suits and actions. No offense committed and no penalty or forfeiture
incurred under the laws of the State or any county ordinance or rule or
regulation shall be affected by the assignment of functions to the State by
this chapter; provided that whenever any punishment, penalty, or forfeiture is
mitigated by any provision of this chapter, such provision may be extended and
applied to any judgment pronounced after May 29, 1965. No suit or
prosecution, pending at the time this chapter takes effect, shall be affected
by this chapter. The right of any administrative officer of the county to
institute proceedings for prosecution for an offense or any action to recover a
penalty or forfeiture shall henceforth be vested in the head of the state
department to which the function has been assigned by the governor or some
person designated by the head of the department or the governor or as may be
otherwise directed by law.

The right of appeal from administrative actions
or determinations as provided by law shall not be impaired by this chapter.

Whenever a right of appeal from administrative
actions or determinations is provided by law to any county for functions which
are assigned to the State, the right of appeal shall lie to or from the state
department to which the assignment of function has been made. The right of
appeal shall exist to the same extent and in accordance with the procedure as
immediately prior to July 1, 1965. [L 1965, c 97, §6; Supp, §14B-5; HRS
§27-4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next